Washington statutes.
RCW 7.16.080

Stay of proceedings.

If a stay of proceedings be not intended, the words requiring the stay must be omitted from the writ. These words may be inserted or omitted, in the sound discretion of the court, but if omitted the power of the inferior court or office is not suspended or the proceedings stayed.

[ 1895 c 65 s 8; RRS s 1006.]